Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 33 Livestock Districts

Cross references. —

As to agricultural marketing, see ch. 35 of this title.

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-253

.

As to livestock roaming at large in Hot Springs state park, see §

36-8-316

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 28, 32, 36-38; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals § 1 et seq.; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Fences § 1 et seq.; 56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 10, 12 to 15.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 139 to 157.

§ 11-33-101.
Creation; generally; applicable provisions.

The board of county commissioners
of each county in the state may create livestock districts within
any irrigation district organized under the irrigation district laws
of this state as hereinafter provided. When a district is created, W.S.

11-33-101

through

11-33-109

apply and are enforceable therein.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-600; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cited

in

Chicago & N.W. Ry. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

For note on the open range and fencing, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 136 (1959).

§ 11-33-102.
Creation; landowners' petition; contents.

At least seventy-five
percent (75%) of the landowners owning at least seventy-five percent
(75%) of the land in any irrigation district organized under the irrigation
district laws of Wyoming and who are resident in and qualified electors
of Wyoming, may petition the board of county commissioners in writing
to create a livestock district. The petition shall describe the boundaries
of the proposed livestock district and shall designate what animals
are to be prohibited from running at large or from being grazed upon
the public highways in the district and may designate the period of
the year during which it is desired to prohibit animals from running
at large or being grazed on the highways.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-601; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-33-103.
Creation; landowners' petition; notice of hearing.

Within twenty (20) days
after a petition has been filed, the board of county commissioners
shall set a date for hearing the petition. Notice of the hearing shall
be given by posting notices in three (3) conspicuous places in the
proposed livestock district and by publication for two (2) weeks previous
to the hearing in a newspaper published in the county nearest the
proposed livestock district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-602; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-33-104.
Creation; order; contents and force.

At the hearing, if satisfied
that at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the landowners owning
at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the land in the proposed livestock
district who are resident in and qualified electors of Wyoming are
in favor of the enforcement of the livestock law and that it would
be beneficial to the district, the board of county commissioners shall
make an order creating the livestock district in accordance with the
prayer of the petition or with such modifications as it may choose
to make. The order shall specify a certain time at which it takes
effect which shall be at least thirty (30) days after the making of
the order. The order shall continue in force until vacated or modified
by the board of county commissioners upon the petition of seventy-five
percent (75%) of the landowners owning seventy-five percent (75%)
of the land in the district who are resident in and qualified electors
of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-603; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-33-105.
Creation; order; mandatory condition of fences.

The board of county commissioners
shall provide as a condition in any order creating a livestock district
that the livestock district shall be enclosed by a lawful fence and
that any road extending from the livestock district shall contain
cattle guards or gates at such places and of such nature as the board
prescribes. The board of county commissioners shall make its livestock
district orders inapplicable to cattle, horses, sheep or mules straying
into the livestock district until the district is enclosed by lawful
fence and cattle guards or gates are installed.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-604; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to fences and cattle guards generally, see §§

11-28-101

to

11-28-108

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutes requiring the construction of fences—modern cases, 87 ALR4th 1129.

§ 11-33-106.
Extent of jurisdiction.

W.S.

11-33-101

and

11-33-105

do not confer upon the board of county commissioners
any jurisdiction over animals otherwise prohibited from running at
large under existing laws.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-605; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-33-107.
Violation of order deemed misdemeanor; subsequent violations.

Any person who in violation
of any order made pursuant to W.S.

11-33-104

, permits or allows any of the animals designated in the
order, owned by him or under his control, to run at large in the district
or to be grazed on the highway, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The pendency
of any action shall not prevent nor prejudice the bringing of another
action against the same party for a violation of the order committed
after the commencement of the pending action.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-606; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-33-108.
Liability of animal owners; lien on and custody of animals.

The owner of animals
permitted or allowed to run at large, or herded in violation of any
order made in accordance with W.S.

11-33-104

is liable to any person who suffers damage from the depredations
or trespasses of the animals, without regard to the condition of his
fence. The person damaged shall have a lien upon the animals for the
amount of damage done and the cost of the proceedings to recover damages,
and may take the animals into custody until all damages are paid.
The person taking the animals into custody may not retain the animals
for more than five (5) days without commencing an action against the
owner for damages.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-607; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-33-109.
Duty of person taking custody of animals.

Any person may take into
custody any of the animals specified in the order of the board of
county commissioners that may be about to commit a trespass upon the
premises owned, occupied or in charge of the person and retain the
animals until all reasonable charges for keeping the animals are paid.
The person taking the animals into custody shall notify the owner
or person in charge of the animals within five (5) days thereafter.
If the owner or person in charge of the animals is not known to the
person taking the animals into custody, and cannot be found after
diligent inquiry, he may proceed in the manner provided for the taking
up and disposal of estrays.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 104, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 11-608; W.S. 1977, §

11-38-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.